Louisiana, session 2026, HB1012.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 44:11.2(A)(10) and (K) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§11.2. Limited access to personal information for protected individuals
A. As used in this Section, the term "protected individual" shall mean:
* * *
(10) A victim of a sex offense as defined in R.S. 15:541.
* * *
K.(1) A request made by a victim of a sex offense as provided in Subsection
E of this Section shall include with it a police report, protective order, or final
judgment indicating that the person is or is alleged to be a victim of a sex offense.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1012 ENROLLED
(2) A person shall not knowingly publish the personal information of a
victim of a sex offense if he knows or reasonably should know that publishing the
personal information poses an imminent and serious threat to the protected individual
and the publishing of the personal information results in any of the following:
(a) An assault in any degree.
(b) Harassment.
(c) Trespass.
(d) Malicious destruction of property.
(3)(a) Notwithstanding Subsection F of this Section, not later than five days
after receiving a request as provided by Subsection E of this Section from a victim
of a sex offense, the public body shall acknowledge receipt of the request in writing
by certified mail or by email and take steps reasonably necessary to ensure that the
personal information is not published.
(b) Notwithstanding Subsection F of this Section, if the personal information
of a victim of a sex offense was published prior to receipt of a request as provided
in Subsection E of this Section, the public body shall provide for the removal of the
personal information of the victim within seventy-two hours after acknowledgment
of receipt of the request or provide to the victim a reason in writing why the request
has not been fulfilled.
(4) Notwithstanding Subsection I of this Section, a person who violates this
Section as it relates to personal information of a victim of a sex offense is guilty of
a misdemeanor and on conviction is subject to imprisonment not exceeding eighteen
months or a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars, or both. Neither this provision
nor any other penalty provision provided for in this Section shall apply to a public
body.
Section 2. The legislature recognizes the importance of empowering those
individuals who are victims of sex offenses and the need to protect their privacy and
personal information from disclosure. It is therefore the intent of the legislature to enact
statutory provisions to limit public access to personal information of victims of sex offenses
and to provide for legal consequences for the unauthorized release of this information. This
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1012 ENROLLED
Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Sexual Assault Survivor Empowerment and
Privacy Protection Act."
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.